Maine, session 132, LD1283.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §173, sub-§2, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 356, §1, is amended
to read:
B. Notwithstanding any provision of state law related to payroll deduction to the
contrary, require each covered employer to offer its covered employees the choice
whether or not to contribute to a payroll deduction IRA by automatically enrolling them
by allowing covered employees to elect to enroll in the payroll deduction IRA with the
opportunity to opt out unenroll. A covered employee who is not a participant because
that employee has opted out elected not to enroll will be automatically reenrolled
offered the opportunity to contribute to a payroll deduction IRA with the opportunity
to opt out again unenroll at regular or ad hoc intervals determined by the board in its
discretion, but not more frequently than annually;
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §173, sub-§2, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 356, §1, is amended
to read:
D. Provide that, unless otherwise specified by the covered employee, a covered
employee who elects to enroll in the program must automatically initially contribute
5% of the covered employee's salary or wages to the program and may elect to opt out
of unenroll from the program at any time or contribute at any higher or lower rate,
expressed as a percentage of salary or wages, or, if the board in its discretion permits,
expressed as a flat dollar amount, subject in all cases to the IRA contribution and
income eligibility limits applicable under the Internal Revenue Code at no additional
charge. The board is authorized to change, from time to time, the 5% automatic initial
default contribution rate for all covered employees in its discretion;
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §173, sub-§2, ¶K, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 356, §1, is amended
to read:
K. Provide for reports on the status of each participant's account to be provided to each
participant at least annually and make best efforts to provide each participant frequent
or continual online access to information on the status of that participant's account. It
is the responsibility of each participant to ensure that all account information is accurate
and up to date;
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §173, sub-§2, ¶S, as amended by PL 2023, c. 167, §5, is further
amended to read:
S. Establish penalties in accordance with subsection 4 for a covered employer that fails
without reasonable cause to enroll a covered employee in the program as required who
elects to enroll or that fails to transmit a payroll deduction IRA contribution to the
program as required. A lack of reasonable cause is established by the failure to enroll
after the program communicates with the employer 3 times;
Sec. 5. 5 MRSA §173, sub-§4, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 167, §7, is further
amended to read:
A. If a covered employer fails to enroll a covered employee without reasonable cause,
the covered employer is subject to a penalty for each covered employee for each
calendar year or portion of a calendar year during which the covered employee was not
enrolled in the program or had not opted out of unenrolled from participation in the
Page 1 - 132LR1102(01)

414 program and, for each calendar year beginning after the date on which a penalty has
425 been assessed with respect to a covered employee, is subject to a penalty for any portion
436 of that calendar year during which the covered employee continues to be unenrolled
447 without opting out of unenrolling from participation in the program. The amount of
458 any penalty imposed on a covered employer for the failure to enroll a covered employee
469 without reasonable cause is determined as follows:
(1) From July 1, 2025 to June 30, 2026, the maximum penalty per covered
employee is $20;
(2) From July 1, 2026 to June 30, 2027, the maximum penalty per covered
employee is $50; and
(4) On or after July 1, 2027, the maximum penalty per covered employee is $100.
Sec. 6. 5 MRSA §174, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 356, §1, is amended
to read:
A. Establish the processes for enrollment and contributions to an IRA under the
program, notwithstanding any provision of state law related to payroll deductions to
the contrary, including withholding by covered employers of employee payroll
deduction contributions from wages and remittance for deposit to an IRA, automatic
enrollment in a payroll deduction IRA and opt-outs by covered employees, voluntary
contributions by others, including self-employed individuals and independent
contractors, through payroll deduction or otherwise, the making of default
contributions using default investments and participant selection of alternative
contribution rates or amounts and alternative investments from among the options
offered under the program;
Sec. 7. 5 MRSA §174, sub-§2, ¶G, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 356, §1, is amended
by amending subparagraph (6) to read:
(6) Instructions for enrolling, opting out of participation, making contributions and
making withdrawals, including the possibility of contributing to an IRA, whether
offered under the program or not, by means other than automatic enrollment in a
payroll deduction IRA;
Sec. 8. 5 MRSA §175, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 356, §1, is amended
to read:
A. An employee's decision whether or not to participate in or opt out of the program;